Hawaii, session 2025, GM1244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the federal
government has recently authorized the creation of rural
emergency hospitals, a new type of medicare provider meant to
help address the concerning increase in rural hospital closures
nationwide. Rural emergency hospitals provide rural communities
with emergency department services, observation care, and
tailored outpatient medical and health services, including
laboratory and imaging services. By adopting the rural
emergency hospital designation, a hospital can focus on these
important services while eliminating certain high-cost services
that the community is not utilizing, such as inpatient care.
This focus allows the hospital to allocate its limited resources
to better address needs of the community the hospital serves.
The legislature further finds that the creation of the
rural emergency hospital designation may be beneficial to the
financial health of certain hospitals and the communities they
serve. By adopting a rural emergency hospital designation, a
2025-3378 HB1179 GDI HMSO
iniiiHiiiifflmiiiiii

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
hospital can take advantage of medicare reimbursement policies
that allow the hospital to adapt to community needs while
sustaining budget requirements. Specifically, rural emergency
hospitals receive a fixed monthly payment equal to about
$3,200,000 annually. In addition, medicare payments for
outpatient services such as diagnostic services are five per
cent higher for rural emergency hospitals. Significantly,
patients do not pay additional fees or premiums for receiving
services at a rural emergency hospital. States can also
determine their own ways to support rural emergency hospitals
through medicaid and commercial reimbursement policies.
The legislature also finds that although the cessation of
inpatient services may seem like a loss for a community, for
many rural hospitals the volume of inpatient care is extremely
low. For example, Lanai community hospital is a critical access
hospital that averages less than one patient per day in its
acute inpatient care beds. This low volume illustrates that
people are seeking inpatient care at other locations. Despite
this low volume, hospitals that maintain inpatient care services
must still pay the increasingly high costs of staffing,
equipment, and supplies needed to maintain inpatient care.
2025-3378 HB1179 CDl HMSO
MiMIIIHnillffi

Page 3 H.B. NO. JS’i
C.D. 1
Besides inpatient care, Lanai community hospital currently
provides emergency services along with thousands of days of
nursing and skilled nursing care. Importantly, if Lanai
community hospital becomes a rural emergency hospital, it would
be able to surrender its inpatient licensed beds and allow the
hospital to expand its availability of long-term care and
skilled nursing beds, which are sorely needed by the community.
The legislature notes that each rural emergency hospital is
responsible for meeting higher-level patient care needs by
having transfer agreements with local trauma centers.
The legislature finds that the federal government designed
the rural emergency hospital designation for hospitals like
Lanai community hospital, to allow those hospitals to best meet
the health care needs of their communities by emphasizing
emergency services, long-term care, and skilled nursing.
The legislature also finds that hospitals must first be
recognized as a rural emergency hospital at the state level
before they can pursue the new rural emergency hospital
designation with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services. A state can address licensure through the enactment
of legislation, which should also ensure that the medicaid
2025-3378 HB1179 CDl HMSO
iiiniinHiiHiiMiiiii

Page 4
H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
policy protections that currently support hospitals and the
services the hospitals provide will continue after those
facilities attain a rural emergency hospital designation.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Provide a statutory framework for the licensure of
rural emergency hospitals at the state level; and
(2) Clarify medicaid reimbursement policies for hospitals
transitioning from a critical access hospital
designation to a rural emergency hospital designation.
SECTION 2. Chapter 321, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§3 21- Rural emergency hospitals; licensing. (a) The
department of health may license a hospital as a rural emergency
hospital if the hospital:
(1) Elects to receive the medicare designation as a rural
emergency hospital;
(2) Provides emergency treatment and stabilization
services for an average length of stay of twenty-four
hours or less;
2025-3378 HB1179 CDl HMSO
iBiiRniMiiniiiiniiH

Page 5
H.B. NO.
.1^. 'I g p 2
C.D. 1
(3) Meets the requirements of title 42 United States Code
section 1395x(kkk)(2); and
(4) Passes inspection and receives a recommendation from
the department to the federal Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services to operate as a rural emergency
hospital.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "rural emergency
hospital" means a hospital licensed under this section that was
previously designated and operating as a critical access
hospital as of December 27, 2020."
SECTION 3. Section 346D-1.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§346D-1.S Medicaid reimbursement equity. Not later than
July 1, 2008, there shall be no distinction between
hospital-based and nonhospital-based reimbursement rates for
institutionalized long-term care under medicaid. Reimbursement
for institutionalized intermediate care facilities and
institutionalized skilled nursing facilities shall be based
solely on the level of care rather than the location. This
section shall not apply to critical access hospitals.
Reimbursement rates for facilities that convert from a critical
2025-3378 HB1179 CDl HMSO
IMIilllllHIilligiMliill

Page 6 1179
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
access hospital to another facility type after April 1, 2025,
may maintain a distinction after the facility's conversion.”
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3378 HB1179 CDl HMSO 6
IIHBillWillMIHIIillllll

H.B. NO.
H^i
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 30th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1179, HD 1, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1179, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAFI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
155